en: Pasteurised milks, Pasterized milks
bg: Пастьоризирано мляко
ca: Llet pasteuritzada
de: Pasteurisierte Milch
es: Leches pasteurizadas
fi: pastöroidut maidot
fr: Laits pasteurisés, lait pasteurisé
hr: Pasterizirano mlijeko
it: Latte pastorizzato
lt: Pasterizuotas pienas
nl: Gepasteuriseerde melken, Gepasteuriseerde melk
pt: Leites pasteurizados
ru: Молоко пастеризованное, Пастеризованное молоко
sv: Pastöriserad mjölk

en: Baked milk
fr: Laits au four, lait au four
hr: Pečeno mlijeko
ru: Молоко топлёное, топлёное молоко

en: Low-lactose milk, low-lactose level milk
bg: Мляко с намалено съдържание на лактоза
de: Milch mit niedrigem Laktosegehalt
fi: Vähälaktoosinen maito
fr: Laits à teneur réduite en lactose
hr: Mlijeko s niskim udjelom laktoze
lt: Pienas su mažai laktozės
nl: Lactose-arme melk
ru: молоко низколактозное, низколактозное молоко

en: Lactose-free milk
bg: Мляко без лактоза
ca: Llet sense lactosa
de: Laktosefreie Milch
es: Leche sin lactosa
fi: laktoositon maitojuoma
fr: Laits sans lactose, Laits délactosés, Lait sans lactose, Lait délactosé
hr: Mlijeko bez laktoze
hu: Laktózmentes tej
it: Latte senza lattosio
lt: Pienas be laktozės
nl: Lactose-vrije melken
pl: Mleko bez laktozy
pt: Leites sem lactose
ru: молоко безлактозное, безлактозное молоко
sv: Laktosfri mjölk

en: High digestible milk
de: Hochverdauliche Milch
es: Leche altamente digestible
fr: Lait hautement digestible
hr: Visoko probavljivo mlijeko
it: Latte ad alta digeribilità
nl: Hoog verteerbare melk

en: Fermented plant-milk drinks
fr: Boissons au lait végétal fermentées

en: Milk substitutes, milk replacements, milk substitute, milk replacement
af: Melk plaasvervanger
ar: بديل الحليب
bg: Млечни заместители
ca: Substitutius de la llet, Substitut de la llet
cs: Náhražky mléka, Náhražka mléka
da: Mælkeerstatning
de: Milchersatz
el: Υποκατάστατο γάλακτος
eo: Laktosurogatoj
es: Sustitutos de la leche, Sucedáneo lácteo
fi: Maidon korvike
fr: Substituts du lait, Substitut du lait
he: תחליף חלב
hr: Zamjene za mlijeko
hu: Tejpótlók, Tejhelyettesítő
hy: Կաթի փոխարինիչ
id: Pengganti susu
it: Sostituto del latte
ja: 代用乳
jv: Sesulih susu
ko: 우유 대용물
lt: Pieno pakaitalai, Pieno pakaitalas
mk: Замена за млеко
ms: Pengganti susu
nl: Melkvervangers, Melkvervanger
pl: Zastępniki mleka
pt: Substitutos do leite, Substituto do leite
ru: Заменители молока, Заменитель молока
sl: Mlečni nadomestek
sv: Mjölkersättningar
tr: Süt ikamesi
uk: Замінник молока
zh: 代乳品

en: Plant-based milk alternatives, Plant milks, Vegetable milks, Vegetable drinks, Non-dairy milks
af: Plantmelk
ar: حليب النبات
bg: Растителни млека, Растително мляко
bn: উদ্ভিজ্জ দুধ
ca: Begudes vegetals, Begudes no làctiques, Llet vegetal
cs: Rostlinné mléko
da: Plantedrikke
de: Pflanzenmilch, Pflanzenmilche, Pflanzenmilchen
eo: Vegetala laktoj
es: Bebidas vegetales, Leches vegetales, Leche vegetal, Bebida vegetal
fa: شیر گیاهی
fi: Kasvipohjaiset maidonkorvikkeet, Kasvimaito
fr: Boissons végétales, Laits végétaux, Lait végétal, Laits végétaliens
gl: Leite vexetal
he: חלב מן הצומח
hr: Biljnih mliječnih alternativa, Biljno mlijeko
hu: Névényi tejek, Zöldség tejek, Zöldség italok, Növényi tej
hy: Բուսական կաթ
id: Susu nabati
it: Latte vegetale
ja: 植物性ミルク
jv: Susu tuwuhan
ko: 식물성 밀크
lt: Augalinis pienas
mk: Растително млеко
ms: Susu tumbuhan
nl: Plantaardige melken
pl: Mleka roślinne
pt: Leites de planta, Leite vegetal
ru: Растительное молоко
sk: Rastlinné mlieko
sl: Rastlinsko mleko
so: Caanaha dhirta
sv: Växtmjölk
tr: Bitkisel süt
tt: Үсемлек сөте
uk: Рослинне молоко
vi: Sữa thực vật
zh: 植物奶

en: Cereal-based drinks, Cereal milks, Cereal drinks, Grain milks
ar: حليب الحبوب
ca: Llet de gra
de: Getreidemilch, Getreidemilche, Getreidemilchen
eo: Grena laktosurogatoj
es: Bebidas de cereales, Leches de cereales, Leche de grano
fi: Kasvimaidot
fr: Boissons végétales de céréales, Laits de céréales
hr: Pića na bazi žitarica
hu: Gabona tejek
it: Latte di cereali
ja: グレインミルク
lt: Grūdų pienas, Grūdų gėrimai
nl: Tarwemelken
pl: Mleko zbożowe
pt: Leites de cereais
ru: Зерновое молоко
sv: Gryndrycker
uk: Зернове молоко

en: Amaranth-based drinks, Amaranth milks, Amaranth drinks
de: Amaranthmilch, Amaranthmilche, Amaranthmilchen, Amaranth-Drinks, Amaranth-Drink, Amaranthdrink, Amaranthdrinks
es: Bebidas de amaranto, Leches de amaranto
fr: Boissons à l'amarante, Laits d'amarante
hr: Pića na bazi amaranta
hu: Bársonyvirág tej
nl: Amaranthmelken
zh: 苋菜籽饮料

en: Barley-based drinks, Barley milks, Barley drinks
de: Gerstemilch, Gerstemilche, Gerstemilchen, Gerste-Drinks, Gerste-Drink, Gerstedrink, Gerstedrinks
es: Bebidas de cebada, Leches de cebada
fr: Boissons végétales d'orge, Laits d'orge
hr: Pića na bazi ječma
hu: Árpa tej
lt: Miežių pienas, miežių gėrimai
nl: Gerstemelken

en: Buckwheat-based drinks, Buckwheat milks, Buckwheat drinks
de: Buchweizenmilch, Buchweizenmilche, Buchweizenmilchen, Buchweizen-Drinks, Buchweizen-Drink, Buchweizendrink, Buchweizendrinks
es: Bebidas de trigo sarraceno, Leches de trigo sarraceno
fr: Boissons au sarrasin, Boissons végétales de sarrasin, Laits de sarrasin
hr: Pića na bazi heljde
lt: Grikių pienas
nl: Boekweitdranken

en: Canary grass-based drinks, Canary grass milks, Canary grass drinks
de: Kanariengrasmilch, Kanariengrasmilche, Kanariengrasmilchen, Kanariengras-Drinks, Kanariengras-Drink, Kanariengrasdrink, Kanariengrasdrinks
es: Bebidas de alpiste, Leches de alpiste
fr: Boissons végétales d'alpiste, Laits d'alpiste
hr: Pića na bazi kanarinske trave
nl: Kanariegrasdranken

en: Maize-based drinks, Maize milks, Corn milks, Maize drinks, Corn drinks
bg: Напитка с царевица
de: Maismilch, Maismilche, Maismilchen, Mais-Drinks, Mais-Drink, Maisdrink, Maisdrinks
es: Bebidas de maíz, Leches de maíz
fr: Boissons au maïs, Boissons végétales de maïs, Laits de maïs
hr: Pića na bazi kukuruza
it: Latte di mais
nl: Maisdranken

en: Millet-based drinks, Millet milks, Millet drinks
de: Hirsemilch, Hirsemilche, Hirsemilchen, Hirse-Drinks, Hirse-Drink, Hirsedrink, Hirsedrinks
es: Bebidas de mijo, Leches de mijo
fr: Boissons au millet, Boissons végétales de millet, Laits de millet
hr: Pića na bazi prosa
it: Latte di miglio
nl: Gierstdranken

en: Oat-based drinks, Oat milks, Oat drinks
af: Hawermelk
ar: حليب الشوفان
bg: Напитка с овес
ca: Beguda de civada
cs: Ovesné mléko
cy: Llaeth ceirch
da: Havredrikke, Havremælk
de: Hafermilch, Hafermilche, Hafermilchen, Hafer-Drinks, Hafer-Drink, Haferdrink, Haferdrinks
eo: Avenlaktoj
es: Bebidas de avena, Leches de avena, Bebida de avena
et: Kaerahelbepiim
fa: شیر جو دوسر
fi: Kaurajuomat, Kauramaito
fr: Boissons à l'avoine, Laits d'avoine, Lait d’avoine, Boissons à base d'avoine, Lait d'avoine
he: חלב שיבולת, חלב שיבולת שועל, משקאות שיבולת שועל, משקאות שיבולת, חלבי שיבולת, חלבי שיבולת שועל
hr: Pića na bazi zobi
hu: Zabtej
hy: Վարսակի կաթ
id: Sari gandum
io: Avena lakto
it: Bevanda di avena
ja: オートミルク, オーツ・ミルク
jv: Susu oat
ko: 귀리유
lt: Avižų pienas
nb: Havredrikk
nl: Haverdranken, Havermoutmelken, Havermelken, Havermelk
pl: Mleka owsiane, Mleko owsiane
pt: Bebidas de aveia, Leite de aveia
ru: Овсяное молоко
se: Hávvarmielki
sk: Ovsené mlieko
sl: Ovseno mleko
sr: Овсено млеко
sv: Havredrycker, Havremjölk
uk: Вівсяне молоко
vi: Sữa yến mạch
wa: Laecea d' avoenne
zh: 燕麦奶

en: Plain oat-based drinks, Natural oat milks, Natural oat drinks, Plain oat milks, Plain oat drinks
de: Natürliche Hafermilch, Natürliche Hafergetränke, Einfache Hafermilch, Einfache Hafergetränke
es: Bebidas de avena naturales, Leches de avena naturales
fr: Boissons végétales d’avoine nature, Boissons végétales d'avoine nature, Laits d'avoine nature, Boissons à base d'avoine nature
hr: Obična pića na bazi sobi
it: Latte di avena naturale
nl: Natuurlijke haverdranken
sv: Naturelle havredrycker

en: Unsweetened plain oat-based drinks, Unsweetened natural oat milks
fr: Boissons végétales d'avoine nature non sucrées
sv: Osötade naturelle havredrycker

en: Sweetened plain oat-based drinks, Sweetened natural oat milks
fr: Boissons végétales d'avoine nature sucrées
sv: Sötade naturelle havredrycker

en: Flavoured oat-based drinks
sv: Havredrycker med smak